Hawaii statutes.
§657-35 Extension of time by death. If
the person first entitled to make the entry or bring the action dies during the
continuance of any of the disabilities mentioned in section 657‑34, the
entry may be made or the action brought by that person's heirs, or any other
person claiming from, by, or under the person first entitled to make the entry
or bring the action, at any time within five years after that person's death,
notwithstanding the twenty years have expired. [L 1870, c 22, §5; am L 1898, c
19, §4; RL 1925, §2661; RL 1935, §3932; RL 1945, §10443; RL 1955, §241-34; HRS
§657-35; am L 1972, c 105, §1(p); am L 1979, c 105, §63; am L 2016, c 55, §36]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next